Tennessee, session 114, SB1302.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-10-418, is amended by adding
the following new subsection:
(h) A copy of the annual report required by subsection (e) must also be
submitted to the legislative librarian.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1302
001497
- 1 -